Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.760

Computer file—Duplicate copy—Restrictions and penalties.

The secretary of state shall provide a duplicate copy of the master statewide computer file or electronic data file of registered voters to Washington technology solutions for purposes of creating the jury source list without cost. The information contained in a voter registration application is exempt from inclusion until the applicant reaches age eighteen. Disclosure of information on individuals under the age of 18 is subject to RCW 29A.08.725. Restrictions as to the commercial use of the information on the statewide computer data file of registered voters, and penalties for its misuse, shall be the same as provided in RCW 29A.08.720 and 29A.08.740.

[ 2024 c 54 s 26; 2023 c 361 s 9; 2018 c 109 s 12; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 813; 2009 c 369 s 35; 2004 c 267 s 134; 2003 c 111 s 251; 1995 c 135 s 2. Prior: 1993 c 441 s 2; 1993 c 408 s 10; 1977 ex.s. c 226 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 46 s 3. Formerly RCW 29.04.160.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2018 c 109: See notes following RCW 29A.08.170.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Intent—1995 c 135: "The only intent of the legislature in this act is to correct multiple amendments and delete obsolete provisions. It is not the intent of the legislature to change the substance or effect of any presently effective statute." [ 1995 c 135 s 1.]

Effective date—1993 c 441: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 441 s 3.]

Severability—Effective dates—1993 c 408: See notes following RCW 2.36.054.